Hawaii, session 2025, SB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-143.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291C-143.5[]]  Low-speed electric bicycles; operator age.  No person under the age of [fifteen] sixteen shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________